Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-136
Failure to adopt or review standards; judicial review.

A county board's failure to adopt standards or to review standards as required by sections 68-131 to 68-148 may be reviewed by the district court of the county in an action in mandamus.

Laws 1983, LB 604, § 6.